Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1626
Compliance with act; when required.

Any political subdivision using self-funding to provide hospitalization, medical, surgical, and sickness and accident coverage or any one or more of such coverages for its employees or its employees and their dependents immediately prior to June 8, 1991, shall comply with the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act no later than December 31, 1991.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 26.